en: Coffee Servers & Tea Pots
xx: Coffee Servers & Tea Pots
cs: Kávové a čajové servisy a konvičky
da: Kaffe- og tekander
de: Kaffee- & Teekannen
es: Cafeteras y teteras
fr: Cafetières et théières, Cafetière
it: Caraffe da caffè e teiere
ja: コーヒーサーバー・ティーポット
nl: Koffie- en theepotten
no: Termoser og kanner til kaffe og te
pl: Dzbanki do kawy i herbaty
pt: Bules de café e chá
ru: Чайники и кофейники
sv: Kaffe- och tekannor
tr: Kahve Cezveleri ve Çaydanlıklar

en: Dinnerware
xx: Dinnerware
cs: Nádobí
da: Spisestel
de: Geschirr
es: Vajilla
fr: Vaisselle de table, Vaisselle
it: Stoviglie da cena
ja: 食器
nl: Etensborden
no: Middagsservise og -bestikk
pl: Zastawy obiadowe
pt: Aparelho de jantar
ru: Обеденная посуда
sv: Tallrikar och bordsserviser
tr: Yemek Takımları

en: Bowls
xx: Bowls
cs: Mísy
da: Skåle
de: Schüsseln
es: Cuencos
fr: Bols, Bol
it: Recipienti
ja: お椀・深鉢
nl: Kommen
no: Boller
pl: Miski
pt: Tigelas
ru: Чаши
sv: Skålar
tr: Kaseler

en: Drinking Glasses
xx: Drinking Glasses
fr: Verres à boire, Verre à boire

en: Dinnerware Sets
xx: Dinnerware Sets
cs: Sady nádobí
da: Spisestel – sæt
de: Geschirrsets
es: Juegos de vajilla
fr: Services de table
it: Set di stoviglie
ja: 食器セット
nl: Serviessets
no: Sett med middagsservise og bestikk
pl: Komplety obiadowe
pt: Aparelhos de jantar
ru: Наборы обеденной посуды
sv: Matserviser
tr: Yemek Setleri

en: Plates
xx: Plates
cs: Talíře
da: Tallerkener
de: Teller
es: Platos
fr: Assiettes, Assiette
it: Piatti
ja: 皿
nl: Borden
no: Tallerkener
pl: Talerze
pt: Pratos
ru: Тарелки
sv: Tallrikar
tr: Tabaklar

en: Drinkware
xx: Drinkware
cs: Nádoby na nápoje
da: Glas og kopper
de: Trinkgefäße
es: Cristalería
fr: Articles de boisson
it: Bicchieri
ja: グラス・カップ
nl: Glazen
no: Drikkeglass
pl: Naczynia do napojów
pt: Utensílios para bebidas
ru: Посуда для напитков
sv: Glas och karaffer
tr: Bardak Takımları

en: Beer Glasses
xx: Beer Glasses
cs: Pivní sklenice
da: Ølglas
de: Biergläser
es: Vasos y jarras de cerveza
fr: Verres à bière
it: Bicchieri da birra
ja: ビアグラス
nl: Bierglazen
no: Ølglass
pl: Kufle piwne
pt: Copos para cerveja
ru: Пивные кружки и стаканы
sv: Ölglas
tr: Bira Bardakları

en: Coffee & Tea Cups
xx: Coffee & Tea Cups
cs: Šálky na čaj a kávu
da: Kaffekopper og tekopper
de: Kaffee- und Teetassen
es: Tazas de café y té
fr: Tasses à café et à thé, Tasse
it: Tazzine da caffè e tazze da tè
ja: コーヒーカップ・ティーカップ
nl: Koffie- en theekopjes
no: Kaffe- og tekopper
pl: Filiżanki do kawy i herbaty
pt: Xícaras de café e chá
ru: Кофейные и чайные чашки
sv: Kaffe- och tekoppar
tr: Kahve ve Çay Fincanları

en: Coffee & Tea Saucers
xx: Coffee & Tea Saucers
cs: Talířky k šálkům na čaj a kávu
da: Underkopper
de: Kaffee- und Teeuntertassen
es: Platos de café y té
fr: Soucoupes de tasses à café et à thé
it: Piattini da caffè e da tè
ja: コーヒーカップ・ティーカップ用ソーサー
nl: Koffie- en theeschoteltjes
no: Kaffe- og teskåler
pl: Spodki do kawy i herbaty
pt: Pires de café e chá
ru: Кофейные и чайные блюдца
sv: Kaffe- och tefat
tr: Kahve ve Çay Tabakları

en: Drinkware Sets
xx: Drinkware Sets
cs: Sady nápojového skla
da: Glas- og kopstel
de: Trinkbehältersets
es: Juegos de cristalería
fr: Services de verres
it: Set di bicchieri
ja: グラス・カップセット
nl: Drinkglazensets
no: Sett med drikkeglass
pl: Zestawy naczyń do napojów
pt: Conjuntos de utensílios para bebidas
ru: Наборы посуды для напитков
sv: Set med glas och karaffer
tr: Bardak Setleri

en: Mugs
xx: Mugs
cs: Hrníčky
da: Krus
de: Kaffee- & Teebecher
es: Tazas
fr: Mugs, Mug
it: Tazze
ja: マグカップ
nl: Mokken
no: Krus
pl: Kubki
pt: Canecas
ru: Кружки
sv: Muggar
tr: Kulplu Bardaklar

en: Shot Glasses
xx: Shot Glasses
cs: Likérky
da: Shotglas
de: Schnapsgläser
es: Vasos de chupito
fr: Verres à liqueur
it: Bicchieri da shot
ja: ショットグラス
nl: Shotglazen
no: Shotglass
pl: Kieliszki do shotów
pt: Copos para aperitivo
ru: Стопки
sv: Shotglas
tr: Shot Bardakları

en: Stemware
xx: Stemware
cs: Skleničky
da: Stilkglas
de: Stielgläser
es: Copas
fr: Verres à pied
it: Bicchieri con gambo
ja: ワイングラス・カクテルグラス
nl: Glazen met steel
no: Stettglass
pl: Kieliszki
pt: Taças
ru: Бокалы
sv: Glas på fot
tr: Saplı Bardak Takımları

en: Tumblers
xx: Tumblers
cs: Sklenice
da: Glas uden fod
de: Trinkgläser
es: Vasos
fr: Gobelets
it: Bicchieri per liquori
ja: タンブラー
nl: Tumblers
no: Drikkeglass med flat bunn
pl: Tumblery
pt: Copos
ru: Стаканы
sv: Glas utan fot
tr: Su Bardakları

en: Flatware
xx: Flatware
cs: Příbory
da: Spisebestik
de: Tischbestecke
es: Cubiertos
fr: Couverts, Couverts en métal
it: Posate
ja: 箸・カトラリー
nl: Bestek
no: Bestikk
pl: Sztućce
pt: Louça rasa
ru: Плоская керамическая посуда
sv: Matbestick
tr: Çatal Bıçaklar

en: Chopstick Accessories
xx: Chopstick Accessories
cs: Jídelní hůlky – příslušenství
da: Spisepinde – tilbehør
de: Essstäbchenzubehör
es: Accesorios para palillos
fr: Accessoires pour baguettes
it: Accessori per bastoncini
ja: 箸用品
nl: Accessoires voor eetstokjes
no: Tilbehør til spisepinner
pl: Akcesoria do pałeczek
pt: Acessórios para hashi (pauzinhos)
ru: Принадлежности для палочек для еды
sv: Tillbehör till ätpinnar
tr: Yemek Çubuğu Aksesuarları

en: Chopsticks
xx: Chopsticks
cs: Jídelní hůlky
da: Spisepinde
de: Essstäbchen
es: Palillos
fr: Baguettes
it: Bastoncini
ja: 箸
nl: Chopsticks
no: Spisepinner
pl: Pałeczki
pt: Hashi (pauzinhos)
ru: Палочки для еды
sv: Ätpinnar
tr: Yemek Çubukları

en: Flatware Sets
xx: Flatware Sets
cs: Příborové sady
da: Spisebestiksæt
de: Besteck-Sets
es: Juegos de cubertería
fr: Ménagères
it: Set di posate
ja: 箸・カトラリーセット
nl: Besteksets
no: Bestikksett
pl: Zestawy sztućców
pt: Conjuntos de talheres
ru: Столовые наборы
sv: Bestickset
tr: Çatal Bıçak Setleri

en: Forks
xx: Forks
cs: Vidličky
da: Gafler
de: Gabeln
es: Tenedores
fr: Fourchettes, Fourchette
it: Forchette
ja: フォーク
nl: Vorken
no: Gafler
pl: Widelce
pt: Garfos
ru: Вилки
sv: Gafflar
tr: Çatallar